Hawaii statutes.
§663-5 Death of defendant, continuance of
action. In any case where the wrongdoer or other person who may be liable
for damages for physical injury or death as provided by section 663-3 dies
after action has been instituted against the wrongdoer or other person
therefor, the action may be continued against the legal representative of the
wrongdoer's or other person's estate in accordance with chapter 634. [L 1953, c
206, pt of §1; am L 1955, c 205, pt of §3; RL 1955, §246-4; HRS §663-5; am L
1972, c 144, §2(d); gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Abatement and revival, see chapter 634, pt V.

Probate, claims, see chapter 560.

Rules of Court

Substitution of parties, see HRCP rule 25; DCRCP rule 25.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next